tests/data/bidix-epsilons-mono.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖšŠčČðđÐ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="pp"/>
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<pardef n="DONT_REMOVE_bug_was_dependent_on_transition_order">
  <e>                    <p><l>b</l> <r>b</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
  <e><i>a</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
  <e><i>b</i><par n="__vblex"/></e>
</section>
</dictionary>
